District of Columbia statutes.
16-4010

Low-income parties.

(a)

The disqualification of § 16-4009(a) applies to a collaborative lawyer representing a party with or without fee.

(b)

After a collaborative law process concludes, another lawyer in a law firm with which a collaborative lawyer disqualified under § 16-4009(a) is associated may represent a party without fee in the collaborative matter or a matter related to the collaborative matter if:

(1)

The party has an annual income that qualifies the party for free legal representation under the criteria established by the law firm for free legal representation;

(2)

The collaborative law participation agreement so provides; and

(3)

The collaborative lawyer is isolated from any participation in the collaborative matter or a matter related to the collaborative matter through procedures within the law firm that are reasonably calculated to isolate the collaborative lawyer from such participation.

May 9, 2012, D.C. Law 19-125, § 2(b), 59 DCR 1928
Uniform Law: This section is based on § 10 of the Uniform Collaborative Law Act.
This section is referenced in § 16-4009, § 16-4014, and § 16-4020.